New Jersey, session 222, S4462.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. The Department of Children and Families shall establish and maintain a Statewide evidence-based program to provide treatment services for children and their family members exposed to domestic violence. b.   The department shall provide grants to providers for developing and implementing therapeutic treatment, counseling, and supportive services to those children and their family members who have been exposed to domestic violence. c.   The department shall assign staff to develop strategies for assisting providers in implementing this program throughout the State.  The department shall monitor the implementation of the program by requiring participating organizations to maintain accurate records concerning the levels of service, referral activity, and overall program management. 2.    The department shall collect and maintain data on the program established and maintained by the department pursuant to section 1 of this act and provide an annual report to the Governor and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), including information on the number of counties or municipalities that have implemented the program and the number of participants in the program.  The report shall also include information on the effectiveness of the program. 3.    The Department of Children and Families may adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), such rules and regulations as may be necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 4.    There shall be appropriated from the General Fund such funds as are necessary to implement the provisions and to effectuate the purposes of this act as shall be included in any general or supplemental appropriation act. 5.    This act shall take effect immediately.